District of Columbia statutes.
7-2206

Limitation of liability.

Neither the District of Columbia nor any volunteer agency in the service of said District nor, except in cases of willful misconduct or gross negligence, any officer, agent, or employee of the District of Columbia or volunteer agency, or any regularly appointed volunteer worker, engaged in civil defense activities, while complying with or attempting to comply with any provision of this chapter or of any rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant to this chapter, shall be liable to any person, whether or not such person is engaged in civil defense, for death, injury, or property damage resulting therefrom. The provisions of this section shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he would otherwise be entitled under any workmen’s compensation law, or under any pension, retirement, or disability law, nor the right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any other act of Congress.

History

Aug. 11, 1950, 64 Stat. 440, ch. 686, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1406.
1973 Ed., § 6-1204.